Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-1218
Revenue bonds; interest; maturity.

Revenue bonds issued pursuant to section 14-1217 shall bear interest payable semiannually, and shall mature in not more than twenty years from their date or dates and may be made redeemable at the option of the city of the metropolitan class issuing such bonds at not more than the par value of such bonds plus a premium of five percent, under such terms and conditions as the city council may fix prior to the issuance of such bonds.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 10, p. 619;

C.S.1929, § 14-1210;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 2, p. 108;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1210;

R.S.1943, § 14-1218;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 22, p. 287;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 251.
July 21, 2022